Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1982 and 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to sec. 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1982, 1983, 1991, 1995, 2006, and 2014 to make other minor word changes under AS

01.05.031

.

Collateral references. —

Arnold H. Rutkin, Family Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).